Utah statutes.
53-2a-103.   Division of Emergency Management -- Creation -- Director -- Appointment -- Term -- Compensation.

(1)  There is created within the Department of Public Safety the Division of Emergency Management.

(2)  The division shall be administered by a director appointed by the commissioner with the approval of the governor.

(3)  The director is the executive and administrative head of the division and shall be experienced in administration and possess additional qualifications as determined by the commissioner and as provided by law.

(4)  The director acts under the supervision and control of the commissioner and may be removed from the position at the will of the commissioner.

(5)  The director shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

